Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 51
SECURITIES

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 125, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1990, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1990, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For provisions on investment securities, see article 8 of title 4.

Law reviews:

For article, "Recent Developments Affecting Securities Litigation in

C

olorado", see 13

C

olo. Law. 1161 (1984); for article, "Securities", which discusses Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with securities law, see 61 Den. L.J. 369 (1984), 62 Den. U.L. Rev. 295 (1985), and 63 Den. U. L. Rev. 435 (1986); for article, "Securities Regulation in the Burger Court", see 56 U. Colo. L. Rev. 193 (1985); for article, "Securities and Commodity Futures Regulation", which discusses Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with securities law, see 64 Den. U.L. Rev. 329 (1987); for article, "Securities Fraud and the Governmental Issuer", see 16 Colo. Law. 1392 (1987); for article, "Arbitration with a View to the Future", see 17 Colo. Law. 2175 (1988); for article "Resort Condominiums and the Federal Securities Laws", see 18 Colo. Law. 229 (1989); for a discussion of Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with securities law, see 66 Den. U.L. Rev. 797 (1989); for article, "The New Colorado Securities Act", see 19 Colo. Law. 1767 (1990); for article, "Securities Litigation in the 1990s", see 19 Colo. Law. 2045 (1990); for article, "Colorado Securities Act of 1990: The Securities Commissioner's View", see 19 Colo. Law. 2041 (1990); for a discussion of Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with securities law, see 67 Den. U. L. Rev. 767 (1990); for article, "Colorado's Regulation of Investment Advisers", see 28 Colo. Law. 39 (April 1999); for article, "Contribution Rights in Colorado Securities Fraud Cases", see 29 Colo. Law. 51 (June 2000); for article, "Colorado Securities Act Twenty Years Later", 40 Colo. Law. 31 (Dec. 2011).

Section

PART 1 SHORT TITLE, PURPOSE, AND SCOPE

PART 2 DEFINITIONS AND REFERENCES TO FEDERAL STATUTES AND RULES

PART 3 REGISTRATION OF SECURITIES
AND EXEMPTIONS

PART 4 LICENSING AND REGULATION OF BROKER-DEALERS AND
SALES REPRESENTATIVES

PART 5 FRAUD AND OTHER
PROHIBITED CONDUCT

PART 6 ENFORCEMENT AND CIVIL LIABILITY

PART 7 ADMINISTRATION AND FEES

PART 8 EFFECTIVE DATE - REPEAL OF ARTICLE

PART 9 LOCAL GOVERNMENT INVESTMENT POOL TRUST FUND ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT ACT

PART 10 PROTECT VULNERABLE ADULTS FROM FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION ACT